Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.104

Unlawful advertising—Citations.

(1) If, upon investigation, the director or the director's designee has probable cause to believe that a person holding a registration, an applicant for registration, or a person acting in the capacity of a contractor who is not otherwise exempted from this chapter, has violated RCW 18.27.100 by unlawfully advertising for work covered by this chapter, the department may issue a citation containing an order of correction. Such order shall require the violator to cease the unlawful advertising.

(2) If the person to whom a citation is issued under subsection (1) of this section notifies the department in writing that he or she contests the citation, the department shall afford an opportunity for an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2007 c 436 s 7; 1997 c 314 s 10; 1989 c 175 s 61; 1987 c 362 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.